Idaho, session 2026, S1438.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Idaho:
SECTION 1. Notwithstanding any other provision of law to the contrary,
the appropriation made to the Public Schools Educational Support Pro-
gram's Division of the Idaho Digital Learning Academy is hereby reduced by
$13,500,000 from the Public School Income Fund for the period July 1, 2026,
through June 30, 2027.
SECTION 2. Notwithstanding any other provision of law to the contrary,
the transfer made from the General Fund to the Public School Income Fund in
Section 32 of Senate Bill No. 1362, if enacted by the Second Regular Session
of the Sixty-eighth Idaho Legislature, is hereby reduced by $13,500,000 for
the period July 1, 2026, through June 30, 2027.
SECTION 3. Of the amounts reduced in Section 1 of this act for the Public
Schools Educational Support Program's Division of the Idaho Digital Learn-
ing Academy, $13,500,000 shall be reduced from the amounts considered ex-
pended from the General Fund for the period July 1, 2026, through June 30,
2027.
SECTION 4. RESTRICTING WITHDRAWALS AND PROVIDING FOR REDUCED OFFER-
INGS. Notwithstanding the provisions of Section 33-907, Idaho Code, and any
other provision of law to the contrary, no moneys shall be withdrawn from the
Public Education Stabilization Fund for the Idaho Digital Learning Academy
for services provided during the period July 1, 2026, through June 30, 2027.
The Idaho Digital Learning Academy shall rely on existing cash balances for
any costs associated with eligible enrollments above the appropriation.
Notwithstanding the provisions of Section 33-1020, Idaho Code, and any other
provision of law to the contrary, the Idaho Digital Learning Academy shall


reduce offerings and deny eligible enrollments as necessary to maintain a
positive cash balance.
SECTION 5. DEI COMPLIANCE. The Idaho Digital Learning Academy shall
verify that no state-appropriated funds are used to support courses related
to diversity, equity, inclusion, or social justice ideology that do not
comply with the dignity and nondiscrimination standards stated in Section
33-138, Idaho Code. The Idaho Digital Learning Academy shall submit a report
to the Joint Finance-Appropriations Committee by December 1, 2026, to verify
compliance. For any course found to be out of compliance, the report shall
include details of all expenditures associated with that course. The format
and content of the report will be determined in consultation with the Budget
and Policy Analysis Division of the Legislative Services Office.
SECTION 6. IDAHO DIGITAL LEARNING ACADEMY FUNDING PROCESS. The Leg-
islature shall consider policies to verify funds provided by the state for
match of individual student enrollment, which may include changing how the
state, districts, charters, and public are billed for courses at the Idaho
Digital Learning Academy (IDLA). To assist the Legislature, IDLA shall
provide a report to the Budget and Policy Analysis Division of the Legisla-
tive Services Office that details the information and cost relating to each
available service, class, and course, how IDLA determined the budgeted
amount for each service, class, or course, and a detailed report on budgeted
and expenditure data for costs associated with operating IDLA. Information
provided on services, classes, and courses shall include data on the split of
synchronous and asynchronous offerings, enrollments by course, enrollments
by grade level, number of and type of courses, the split of course enroll-
ments by local education agency separated at the course level, and the number
of graduation requirement courses versus elective courses with their re-
lated enrollments, and other defining factors. The report shall be provided
no later than August 1, 2026, based on data from the 2025-2026 school year.
The format and content of the report will be determined in consultation with
the Budget and Policy Analysis Division of the Legislative Services Office.
SECTION 7. CONDITIONS, LIMITATIONS, AND RESTRICTIONS. Appropriations
made pursuant to this act are subject to the conditions, limitations, and re-
strictions specified in this act.
SECTION 8. An emergency existing therefor, which emergency is hereby
declared to exist, this act shall be in full force and effect on and after
July 1, 2026.